apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="m/iskin__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iskin</l><r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sieken</l><r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/ebbus__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ebbus</l><r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>biebes</l><r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="w/erżieq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>erżieq</l><r>erżieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieżaq</l><r>erżieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/erva__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>erva</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riev</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="prasp/ura__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ura</l><r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="for/ġa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oġ</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/ewlaq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ewlaq</l><r>ewlaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wielaq</l><r>ewlaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/erfux__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>erfux</l><r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riefex</l><r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/aqq__n_m">
    <e><p><l>aqq</l><r>aqq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>quq</l><r>aqq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħol/qa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>qa</l><r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oq</l><r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/aqqun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aqqun</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>qaqan</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>qaqen</l><r>aqqun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/addiena__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>addiena</l><r>addiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dieden</l><r>addiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ieqja__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ieqja</l><r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wieqi</l><r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/att__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>att</l><r>att<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tut</l><r>att<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/ajf__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ajf</l><r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>juf</l><r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sod/da__n_f">
    <e><p><l>da</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>od</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/enbil__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>enbil</l><r>enbil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niebel</l><r>enbil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/aktur__n_m">
    <e><p><l>aktur</l><r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>katar</l><r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="te/ntufa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ntufa</l><r>ntufa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tnief</l><r>ntufa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="qot/na__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>on</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/okkiena__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>okkiena</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kaken</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kieken</l><r>okkiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/artell__n_m">
    <e><p><l>artell</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rietel</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/ajra__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ajra</l><r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jur</l><r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/ieqa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ieqa</l><r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wieqi</l><r>ieqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/ardell__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ardell</l><r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riedel</l><r>ardell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/engħa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>engħa</l><r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>najja'</l><r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="l/ewn__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ewn</l><r>ewn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wien</l><r>ewn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/ifer__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ifer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>far</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/obż__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>obż</l><r>obż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bejjeż</l><r>obż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/arib__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arib</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>raba</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieba</l><r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="VAT__n_f">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="biż/a__n_m">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>għat</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/ejt__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ejt</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jit</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="inkw/et__n_m">
    <e><p><l>et</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iet</l><r>et<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/riħ__n_m">
    <e><p><l>riħ</l><r>riħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>irjieħ</l><r>riħ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="wi/ed__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ed</l><r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dien</l><r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ram/el__n_m">
    <e><p><l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liet</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tnaqq/is__n_m">
    <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>as</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sp/iża__n_f">
    <e><p><l>iża</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjeż</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/era__n_f">
    <e><p><l>era</l><r>era<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>irjiet</l><r>era<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="serq__n_m">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="qi/egħ__n_m">
    <e><p><l>egħ</l><r>egħ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>għan</l><r>egħ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="gerfux" c="careless work" ><i>g</i><par n="g/erfux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="miskin" c="pitiable person" ><i>m</i><par n="m/iskin__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="debbus" c="mace" ><i>d</i><par n="d/ebbus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baqqun" c="pickaxe" ><i>b</i><par n="b/aqqun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żenbil" c="large basket made of broom" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/enbil__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xatt" c="shore" ><i>x</i><par n="x/att__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tentufa" c="a trifle" ><i>te</i><par n="te/ntufa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sodda" c="bed" ><i>sod</i><par n="sod/da__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għoqda" c="knot" ><i>għoq</i><par n="sod/da__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="praspura" c="oddity" ><i>prasp</i><par n="prasp/ura__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħobż" c="bread" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/obż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tieqa" c="window" ><i>t</i><par n="t/ieqa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gardell" c="goldfinch" ><i>g</i><par n="g/ardell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġewlaq" c="wicker basket" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ewlaq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qotna" c="cotton pod" ><i>qot</i><par n="qot/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forġa" c="forge" ><i>for</i><par n="for/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għodda" c="tool" ><i>għod</i><par n="sod/da__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xifer" c="edge" ><i>x</i><par n="x/ifer__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dokkiena" c="large bench" ><i>d</i><par n="d/okkiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bieqja" c="small bowl" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ieqja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xaqq" c="crack" ><i>x</i><par n="x/aqq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerva" c="deer" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erva__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raddiena" c="spinning wheel" ><i>r</i><par n="r/addiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maktur" c="handkerchief" ><i>m</i><par n="m/aktur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="martell" c="hammer" ><i>m</i><par n="m/artell__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tajra" c="fowl" ><i>t</i><par n="t/ajra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċoqqa" c="monks hood" ><i>ċoq</i><par n="ħol/qa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="loġġa" c="arch" ><i>loġ</i><par n="for/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="werżieq" c="cricket" ><i>w</i><par n="w/erżieq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sengħa" c="craft" ><i>s</i><par n="s/engħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lewn" c="colour" ><i>l</i><par n="l/ewn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħolqa" c="metal link" ><i>ħol</i><par n="ħol/qa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sajf" c="summer" ><i>s</i><par n="s/ajf__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="qarib" c="kindred" ><i>q</i><par n="q/arib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="VAT"><i>VAT</i><par n="VAT__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="biża" c="fear"><i>biż</i><par n="biż/a__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żejt" c="oil"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/ejt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="inkwet" c="worry"><i>inkw</i><par n="inkw/et__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="riħ" c="wind"><i></i><par n="/riħ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="wied" c="valley"><i>wi</i><par n="wi/ed__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ramel" c="sand"><i>ram</i><par n="wi/ed__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tnaqqis" c="decrease"><i>tnaqq</i><par n="tnaqq/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spiża" c="expense"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/iża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kera" c="tenancy"><i>k</i><par n="k/era__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="serq" c="theft"><i>serq</i><par n="serq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="qiegħ" c="bottom"><i>qi</i><par n="qi/egħ__n_m"/></e>
